California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(12) (A) “Postproduction” means the final activities in a qualified motion picture’s production, including editing, foley recording, automatic dialogue replacement, sound editing, scoring, music track recording by musicians and music editing, beginning and end credits, negative cutting, negative processing and duplication, the addition of sound and visual effects, sound mixing, film-to-tape transfers, encoding, and color correction.

(B) “Postproduction” does not include the manufacture or shipping of release prints or their equivalent.

(13) “Preproduction” means the process of preparation for actual physical production which begins after a qualified motion picture has received a firm agreement of financial commitment, or is greenlit, with, for example, the establishment of a dedicated production office, the hiring of key crew members, and includes, but is not limited to, activities that include location scouting and execution of contracts with vendors of equipment and stage space.

(14) “Principal photography” means the phase of production during which the motion picture is actually shot, as distinguished from preproduction and postproduction.

(15) “Production period” means the period beginning with preproduction and ending upon completion of postproduction.

(16) “Qualified entity” means a personal service corporation as defined in
 Section 269A(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, a payroll services corporation, or any entity receiving qualified wages with respect to services performed by a qualified individual.

(17) “Qualified expenditures” means amounts paid or incurred for tangible personal property purchased or leased, and used, within this state in the production of a qualified motion picture and payments, including qualified wages, for services performed within this state in the production of a qualified motion picture.

(18) (A) “Qualified individual” means any individual who performs services during the production period in an activity related to the production of a qualified motion picture.

(B) “Qualified individual” shall not include either of the following:

(i) Any individual related to the qualified taxpayer as described in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) of Section 51(i)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(ii) Any 5-percent owner, as defined in Section 416(i)(1)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, of the qualified taxpayer.

(19) (A) “Qualified motion picture” means a motion picture that is produced for distribution to the general public, regardless of medium, that is one of the following:

(i) A feature with a minimum production budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(ii) A miniseries or limited series consisting of two or more episodes, each longer than 40 minutes of running time, exclusive of commercials, that is produced in
 California, with a minimum production budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000) per episode.

(iii) An independent film.

(iv) A television series that relocated to California.

(v) A pilot for a new live action or animated television series that is at least 20 minutes of running time, exclusive of commercials, that is produced in California, and with a minimum production budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(vi) A live action or animated series, averaging across a season at least 20 minutes of running time per episode, exclusive of commercials, that is produced in California, with a minimum production budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000) per episode.

(vii) An animated film that
 is produced in California, with a minimum production budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(viii) A large-scale competition show, not including traditional reality, game shows, talk shows, or docufollow television programming, that is produced in California, with a minimum production budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000) per episode.

(B) To qualify as a “qualified motion picture,” all of the following conditions shall be satisfied:

(i) At least 75 percent of the principal photography days occur wholly in California or 75 percent of the production budget is incurred for payment for services performed within the state and the purchase or rental of property used within the state.

(ii) Production of the qualified motion picture is completed
 within 30 months from the date on which the qualified taxpayer’s application is approved by the California Film Commission. For purposes of this section, a qualified motion picture is “completed” when the process of postproduction has been finished.

(iii) The copyright for the motion picture is registered with the United States Copyright Office pursuant to Title 17 of the United States Code.

(iv) (I) Except as provided in subclause (II), principal photography of the qualified motion picture commences after the date on which the application is approved by the California Film Commission, but no later than 180 days after the date of that approval if the qualified motion picture has a budget with qualified expenditures of less than one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), and no later than 240 days after the date of that approval in the case of a qualified
 motion picture with a budget of qualified expenditures with at least one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), unless death, disability, or disfigurement of the director or of a principal cast member; an act of God, including, but not limited to, fire, flood, earthquake, storm, hurricane, or other natural disaster; terrorist activities; or government sanction has directly prevented a production’s ability to begin principal photography within the prescribed 180- or 240-day commencement period.

(II) Notwithstanding subclause (I), a production that has not previously received an allocation under this section or Section 17053.85, 17053.95, or 17053.98, and that completed principal photography of the previous season more than 48 months prior to the application for a credit allocation under this section, shall be deemed not to have commenced principal photography prior to the date on which the application for an allocation of credit under this
 section is approved by the California Film Commission.

(III) Notwithstanding subclauses (I) and (II), a television series that did not commence principal photography prior to July 1, 2025, and applied for but did not receive an allocation under this section for its first season filming in California and makes an application for allocation of credit for its second season filming in California shall be deemed not to have commenced principal photography prior to the date on which the application for an allocation of credit under this section is approved by the California Film Commission.

(v) (I) At least 75 percent of production costs for picture editing and postproduction sound labor and services shall be incurred in California.

(II) This requirement shall only apply to a qualified motion picture
 applying for an allocation of credits under this section pursuant to subparagraph (G) of paragraph (8) of subdivision (k) of Section 17053.98 or Section 23698.

(vi) Provides a diversity workplan checklist.

(C) For the purposes of subparagraph (A), in computing the total wages paid or incurred for the production of a qualified motion picture, all amounts paid or incurred by all persons or entities that share in the costs of the qualified motion picture shall be aggregated.

(D) “Qualified motion picture” shall not include commercial advertising, music videos, a motion picture produced for private noncommercial use, such as weddings, graduations, or as part of an educational course and made by students, a news program, current events or public events program, talk show, game show, sporting event or activity, awards
 show, telethon or other production that solicits funds, reality television program, except as specified in clause (ix) of subparagraph (A), clip-based programming if more than 50 percent of the content is comprised of licensed footage, documentaries, variety programs, daytime dramas, strip shows, or any production that falls within the recordkeeping requirements of Section 2257 of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(20) (A) “Qualified taxpayer” means a taxpayer, or a single member limited liability company that is disregarded for tax purposes pursuant to Section 23038, who has paid or incurred qualified expenditures, participated in the Career Readiness requirement in Section 17053.95, and has been issued a credit certificate by the California Film Commission pursuant to subdivision (g).

(B) In the case of any pass-thru entity, the determination of whether a
 taxpayer is a qualified taxpayer under this section shall be made at the entity level and any credit under this section is not allowed to the pass-thru entity, but shall be passed through to the partners or shareholders in accordance with applicable provisions of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001). For purposes of this paragraph, “pass-thru entity” means any entity taxed as a partnership or “S” corporation.

(21) “Qualified visual effects” means visual effects where at least 75 percent or a minimum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) of the qualified expenditures for the visual effects are paid or incurred in California.

(22) (A) “Qualified wages” means all of the following:

(i) Any wages subject to withholding under Division 6 (commencing with
 Section 13000) of the Unemployment Insurance Code that were paid or incurred by any taxpayer involved in the production of a qualified motion picture with respect to a qualified individual for services performed on the qualified motion picture production within this state.

(ii) The portion of any employee fringe benefits paid or incurred by any taxpayer involved in the production of the qualified motion picture that are properly allocable to qualified wage amounts described in clauses (i), (iii), and (iv).

(iii) Any payments made to a qualified entity for services performed in this state by qualified individuals within the meaning of paragraph (17).

(iv) Remuneration paid to an independent contractor who is a qualified individual for services performed within this state by that qualified individual.

(B) “Qualified wages” shall not include any of the following:

(i) Expenses, including wages, related to new use, reuse, clip use, licensing, secondary markets, or residual compensation, or the creation of any ancillary product, including, but not limited to, a soundtrack album, toy, game, trailer, or teaser.

(ii) Expenses, including wages, paid or incurred with respect to acquisition, development, turnaround, or any rights thereto.

(iii) Expenses, including wages, related to financing, overhead, marketing, promotion, or distribution of a qualified motion picture.

(iv) Expenses, including wages, paid per person per qualified motion picture for writers, directors, music directors, music
 composers, music supervisors, producers, and performers, other than background actors with no scripted lines.

(23) (A) “Recurring television allocation amount” means the sum of the base year allocation and the product of all of the following:

(i) The base year allocation.

(ii) The number of subsequent years.

(iii) Three percent.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, the following definitions apply:

(i) “Base year allocation” means the amount received by the recurring television series in its fiscal year 2025–26 Credit Allocation Letter or Letters, or if no amounts were reserved in fiscal year 2025–26, in
 the next fiscal year in which a Credit Allocation Letter or Letters were received.

(ii) “The number of subsequent years” means the number of full or partial fiscal years that have elapsed since the fiscal year in which the base year allocation was made.

(24) “Recurring television series” means any television series that was previously approved and issued a credit allocation letter under this section.

(25) “Residual compensation” means supplemental compensation paid at the time that a motion picture is exhibited through new use, reuse, clip use, or in secondary markets, as distinguished from payments made during production.

(26) “Reuse” means any use of a qualified motion picture in the same medium for which it was created, following the initial use in
 that medium.

(27) “Secondary markets” means media in which a qualified motion picture is exhibited following the initial media in which it is exhibited.

(28) “Television series that relocated to California” means a television series, without regard to episode length or initial media exhibition, with a minimum production budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000) per episode, that filmed at least 75 percent of principal photography days in its most recent season outside of California or has filmed all seasons outside of California and for which the taxpayer certifies that the credit provided pursuant to this section is the primary reason for relocating to California.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a qualified taxpayer may sell any credit allowed under this section that is attributable to
 an independent film, as defined in paragraph (7) of subdivision (b), to an unrelated party.

(2) The qualified taxpayer shall report to the Franchise Tax Board prior to the sale of the credit, in the form and manner specified by the Franchise Tax Board, all required information regarding the purchase and sale of the credit, including the social security or other taxpayer identification number of the unrelated party to whom the credit has been sold, the face amount of the credit sold, and the amount of consideration received by the qualified taxpayer for the sale of the credit.

(3) In the case where the credit allowed under this section exceeds the “net tax,” the excess credit may be carried over to reduce the “net tax” in the following taxable year, and succeeding eight taxable years, if necessary, until the credit has been exhausted.

(4) A credit shall not be sold pursuant to this subdivision to more than one taxpayer, nor may the credit be resold by the unrelated party to another taxpayer or other party.

(5) A party that has acquired tax credits under this subdivision shall be subject to the requirements of this section.

(6) In no event may a qualified taxpayer assign or sell any tax credit to the extent the tax credit allowed by this section is claimed on any tax return of the qualified taxpayer.

(7) In the event that both the taxpayer originally allocated a credit under this section by the California Film Commission and a taxpayer to whom the credit has been sold both claim the same amount of credit on their tax returns, the Franchise Tax Board may disallow the credit of either
 taxpayer, so long as the statute of limitations upon assessment remains open.

(8) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to any standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, or guideline established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this subdivision.

(9) Subdivision (g) of Section 17039 shall not apply to any credit sold pursuant to this subdivision.

(10) For purposes of this subdivision, the unrelated party or parties that purchase a credit pursuant to this subdivision shall be treated as a qualified taxpayer pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(d) (1) No credit shall be allowed pursuant to this section unless the
 qualified taxpayer provides the following to the California Film Commission:

(A) Identification of each qualified individual.

(B) The specific start and end dates of production.

(C) The total wages paid.

(D) The total amount of qualified wages paid to qualified individuals.

(E) Aggregate data for individuals whose wages are excluded from qualified wages by clause (iv) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (22) of subdivision (b), including their gender, ethnic, and racial makeup.

(F) The copyright registration number, as reflected on the certificate of registration issued under the authority of Section 410 of Title 17 of the
 United States Code, relating to registration of claim and issuance of certificate. The registration number shall be provided on the return claiming the credit.

(G) The total amounts paid or incurred to purchase or lease tangible personal property used in the production of a qualified motion picture.

(H) Information to substantiate its qualified expenditures.

(I) Information required by the California Film Commission under regulations promulgated pursuant to subdivision (g) necessary to verify the amount of credit claimed.

(J) Data regarding the diversity of the workforce employed by the applicant on the qualified motion picture, as described in subdivision (g).

(K) Documentation verifying
 completion of the Career Readiness requirement.

(L) Documentation verifying that the qualified taxpayer paid the Career Pathways Program fee.

(2) (A) Based on the information provided in paragraph (1), the California Film Commission shall recompute the jobs ratio previously computed in subdivision (g) and compare this recomputed jobs ratio to the jobs ratio that the qualified taxpayer previously listed on the application submitted pursuant to subdivision (g).

(B) (i) If the California Film Commission determines that the jobs ratio has been reduced by more than 10 percent for a qualified motion picture, the California Film Commission shall reduce the amount of credit allowed by an equal percentage, unless the qualified taxpayer demonstrates, and the California Film
 Commission determines, that reasonable cause exists for the jobs ratio reduction.

(ii) If the California Film Commission determines that the jobs ratio has been reduced by more than 20 percent for a qualified motion picture, the California Film Commission shall not accept an application described in subdivision (g) from that qualified taxpayer or any member of the qualified taxpayer’s controlled group for a period of not less than one year from the date of that determination, unless the qualified taxpayer demonstrates, and the California Film Commission determines, that reasonable cause exists for the jobs ratio reduction.

(C) For the purposes of this paragraph, “reasonable cause” means unforeseen circumstances beyond the control of the qualified taxpayer, such as, but not limited to, the cancellation of a television series prior to the completion of the scheduled number of
 episodes or other similar circumstances as determined by the California Film Commission in regulations to be adopted pursuant to subdivision (e).

(e) (1) (A) Subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the California Film Commission shall prescribe rules and regulations to carry out the purposes of this section, including, but not limited to, the following:

(i) Subparagraph (D) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) and clause (iv) of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g).

(ii) Any rules and regulations necessary to establish procedures, processes, requirements, and applications.

(iii) (I) Continuing a Career Pathways Program established pursuant to subdivision (e) of Sections 17053.98 and 23698, and pursuant to paragraph (10) of subdivision (g) of this section and Section 23698.1, to fund technical skills training for individuals from underserved communities for entry into film and television jobs. The program shall be funded by a fee equal to 0.5 percent of the approved credit amount for a qualified motion picture. The program shall work with nonprofit organizations that have an established record of training and job placement in the entertainment industry, focus on training individuals from traditionally underserved communities, and offer training courses focused on skilled, technical positions that would be eligible for qualified wages if performed on a qualified motion picture as well as administrative- and industry-related technical occupations or soft skills training for the motion picture industry.

(II) Notwithstanding subclause (I), independent films are required to pay a fee equal to 0.25 percent of the approved credit amount for a qualified motion picture.

(iv) (I) Beginning January 1, 2028, the California Film Commission, in collaboration with labor and industry stakeholders, has the authority to increase the Career Pathways Training program fee by 0.25 percent per year, up to 1 percent of the approved credit amount for a qualified motion picture, based on evaluation of available information, including, but not limited to, the number of jobs available, job growth in the industry, and information included in the annual reports of the Career Pathways Training program required pursuant to paragraph (11) of subdivision (g). The evaluation shall be included in the annual report to the Legislature.

(II) Independent films are not subject to an
 increase to the fee pursuant to subclause (I).

(B) Notwithstanding any other law, prior to preparing a notice of proposed action pursuant to Section 11346.4 of the Government Code and prior to making any revision to the proposed regulation other than a change that is nonsubstantial or solely grammatical in nature, the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development shall first approve the proposed regulation or proposed change to a proposed regulation regarding allocating the credit pursuant to subdivision (i), computing the jobs ratio as described in subdivisions (d) and (g), and defining “reasonable cause” pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d).

(2) The California Film Commission shall not be required to prepare an economic impact analysis pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of
 Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) with regard to any rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this subdivision.

(f) If the qualified taxpayer fails to provide the copyright registration number as required in subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), the credit shall be disallowed and assessed and collected under Section 19051 until the procedures are satisfied.

(g) For purposes of this section, the California Film Commission shall do all of the following:

(1) (A) Subject to the requirements of subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive, of paragraph (2), on or after July 1, 2025, and before July 1, 2030, in four or more allocation periods per fiscal year, allocate tax credits to applicants.

(B) The California Film
 Commission shall increase the total credit amount allocated to an applicant by up to 2 percent of the initial credit amount allocated under this section, as determined by the California Film Commission, for qualified productions that employ trainees from a Career Pathways Program pursuant to subparagraph (E) of paragraph (10).

(2) (A) Establish a procedure for applicants to file with the California Film Commission a written application, on a form jointly prescribed by the California Film Commission and the Franchise Tax Board for the allocation of the tax credit. The application shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information:

(i) The budget for the motion picture production.

(ii) The number of production days.

(iii) A financing plan for the production.

(iv) The diversity of the workforce employed by the applicant, including, but not limited to, the ethnic and racial makeup of the individuals employed by the applicant during the production of the qualified motion picture, to the extent possible.

(v) The amount of qualified wages the applicant expects to pay to qualified individuals.

(vi) The amount of tax credit the applicant computes the qualified motion picture will receive, applying the applicable credit percentages described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a).

(vii) A statement establishing that the tax credit described in this section is a significant factor in the applicant’s choice of location for the qualified motion picture. The statement
 shall include information about whether the qualified motion picture is at risk of not being filmed or specify the jurisdiction or jurisdictions in which the qualified motion picture will be located in the absence of the tax credit. The statement shall be signed by an officer or executive of the applicant.

(viii) The applicant’s written policy against unlawful harassment, including, but not limited to, sexual harassment, which includes procedures for reporting and investigating harassment claims, a phone number for an individual who will be responsible for receiving harassment claims, and a statement that the company will not retaliate against an individual who reports harassment. The applicant shall also indicate how the policy will be distributed to employees and include a summary of education training resources, including the prohibition against, and prevention and correction of, sexual harassment and remedies available.

(ix) If applicable, summary of the applicant’s voluntary programs to increase the representation of minorities and women in the job classifications that are not included in qualified wages as set forth in clause (iv) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (22) of subdivision (b) and information about how these programs are publicized to interested parties. The officer or executive referenced in clause (xi) who is signing the statement shall provide additional information about these programs, if needed and upon request, to the California Film Commission.

(x) Any other information deemed relevant by the California Film Commission or the Franchise Tax Board.

(B) Establish criteria, consistent with the requirements of this section, for allocating tax credits.

(C) Determine and designate applicants who meet the requirements of this section.

(D) For purposes of allocating the credit amounts subject to the categories described in subdivision (i) in any fiscal year, the California Film Commission shall do all of the following:

(i) For each allocation date and for each category, list each applicant from highest to lowest according to the jobs ratio as computed by the California Film Commission.

(ii) Subject to the applicable credit percentage, allocate the credit to each applicant according to the highest jobs ratio, working down the list, until the credit amount is exhausted.

(iii) (I) Pursuant to regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (e), the California Film Commission
 may increase the jobs ratio by up to 25 percent if a qualified motion picture increases economic activity in California according to criteria developed by the California Film Commission that would include, but not be limited to, those factors as, the amount of the production and postproduction spending in California, the employment of scoring musicians in California, and other criteria measuring economic impact in California as determined by the California Film Commission. The criteria developed by the California Film Commission shall not assess fewer points for the employment of scoring musicians in California than any other category within the jobs ratio bonus.

(II) For qualified motion pictures that are described in clause (i) of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (8) of subdivision (k) of Section 17053.98 and Section 23698, the jobs ratio shall be equal to the product of the jobs ratio calculated in paragraph (8) of subdivision (b) and 133
 percent.

(iv) (I) Notwithstanding any other law, any television series, relocating television series, or any new television series based on a pilot for a new television series that has been approved and issued a credit allocation by the California Film Commission under this section, Section 17053.85, 17053.95, 17053.98, 23685, 23695, 23698, or 23698.1 shall be issued a credit for each subsequent season, for the life of that television series whenever credits are allocated within a fiscal year.

(II) Notwithstanding subclause (I), a recurring television series that does not request a credit allocation within 18 months from the date of completion of principal photography of the previous season is deemed to have waived the credit allocation guarantee provided by this clause and must reapply for a credit allocation. The California Film Commission may by regulation
 determine the appropriate priority to be given in a reapplication process for a recurring series reapplying pursuant to this subclause.

(III) The California Film Commission shall limit the amount of credits any recurring television series, including a recurring television series under subdivision (k) of Section 17053.98, receives in a subsequent season to no more than the recurring television allocation amount.

(IV) In the event that insufficient tax credits are available to fund all recurring television series pursuant to this clause for any fiscal year or in the event the California Film Commission projects, in collaboration with the Department of Finance, that there will be insufficient tax credits available to fund all recurring television series in either of the subsequent two fiscal years, the California Film Commission shall make the following adjustments in the order given
 until the shortfall, or any projected shortfall for the two subsequent fiscal years, for recurring television series is eliminated:

(V) (ia) Notwithstanding clause (iii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (i), the California Film Commission may redirect up to 100 percent of the credit amounts allocated to the relocating television series category to recurring television series for that fiscal year until the shortfall or projected shortfall is eliminated.

(ib) Notwithstanding clause (iv) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (i), the California Film Commission may redirect up to 100 percent of the credit amounts allocated to a new television series to recurring television series for that fiscal year until the shortfall or projected shortfall is eliminated.

(ic) Notwithstanding clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (i), the California Film Commission may redirect up to 100 percent of the credit allocations from the features category to the recurring television series category for that fiscal year until the shortfall is eliminated.

(id) Allocate up to 25 percent of total credit allocations that would otherwise be allocated in the 2029–30 fiscal year to recurring television series in the current fiscal year until the shortfall is eliminated. Any amounts transferred for allocation in the current fiscal year shall be subtracted from the amount allowed to be allocated in the 2029–30 fiscal year as specified in subdivision (i). Notwithstanding paragraph (3), the credit allocations that are subtracted from the 2029–30 fiscal year shall not be certified until July 1, 2030, or later.

(ie) The California
 Film Commission shall consult with the qualified taxpayers who are producing the recurring television series for purposes of negotiating a minimally impactful reduction in the amount of credits awarded to each recurring television series for that fiscal year until the shortfall is eliminated.

(E) Subject to the annual cap and the allocation credit amounts based on categories described in subdivision (i), allocate an aggregate amount of credits under this section and Section 23698.1, and allocate any carryover of unallocated or unused credits from prior years and Sections 17053.85, 17053.95, 17053.98, 23685, 23695, and 23698 and the amount of any credits reduced pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d).

(3) Certify tax credits allocated to qualified taxpayers and do all of the following:

(A) Establish a
 verification procedure to do both of the following:

(i) Update the information in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g), including, but not limited to, the amounts of qualified expenditures paid or incurred by the applicant.

(ii) Ensure that the final safety evaluation report required pursuant to Section 9152 of the Labor Code has been submitted.

(B) Establish audit requirements that shall be satisfied before a credit certificate may be issued by the California Film Commission.

(C) Issue a credit certificate to a qualified taxpayer upon completion of the qualified motion picture reflecting the credit amount allocated after qualified expenditures have been verified and the jobs ratio computed under this section. The amount of credit shown
 on the credit certificate shall not exceed the amount of credit allocated to that qualified taxpayer pursuant to this section.

(D) (i) Notwithstanding any other law, the California Film Commission shall certify a credit amount equal to 96 percent of the total credit allocated to the qualified taxpayer, unless the qualified taxpayer chooses to submit a diversity workplan and the California Film Commission determines that the qualified taxpayer has met or made a good-faith effort to meet the diversity goals in its diversity workplan, pursuant to clause (ii).

(ii) The California Film Commission shall certify an additional credit amount equal to 4 percent of the total credit allocated to the qualified taxpayer if a qualified taxpayer submits to the California Film Commission, in the form and manner required by the commission, all of the following:

(I) A diversity workplan within 30 days after receiving a credit allocation letter. The workplan shall be consistent with the diversity workplan checklist to address diversity and be broadly reflective of California’s population in terms of race, ethnicity, gender, disability status, and veteran status, and shall include all of the following:

(ia) A statement of the diversity goals the motion picture will seek to achieve in terms of qualified wages.

(ib) A statement of the diversity goals the motion picture will seek to achieve for individuals whose wages are excluded from qualified wages.

(ic) A plan of what strategies the motion picture will employ to achieve the goals in this subclause and subclause (II).

(id) Other requirements as the California Film Commission shall determine by regulation.

(II) An interim assessment on the qualified taxpayer’s efforts to meet the diversity workplan prior to the commencement of principal photography. Upon review pursuant to a procedure prescribed in regulations, the California Film Commission shall determine whether the interim assessment indicates that the qualified motion picture is making a good-faith effort to meet the goals of the diversity workplan and shall notify the qualified motion picture of its findings.

(III) A final diversity assessment that includes information about how the project met or made a good-faith effort to meet the diversity workplan, including, but not limited to, aggregate data, voluntarily self-reported by individuals whose wages are included in qualified
 wages and individuals whose wages are excluded from qualified wages, with regard to their race, ethnicity, gender, disability status, veteran status, and ZIP Code.

(iii) The California Film Commission, in consultation with the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development, shall establish guidelines to evaluate diversity workplans as described in this subparagraph. The guidelines shall be posted on the California Film Commission’s internet website.

(iv) The California Film Commission shall approve or reject the diversity workplan of an applicant, to the extent allowed by federal and state law.

(v) This subparagraph shall not apply to an independent film with qualified expenditures of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) or less.

(vi) The
 requirements of this subparagraph shall not apply to a recurring television series receiving an allocation of credits under this section pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (8) of subdivision (k) of Section 17053.98 or Section 23698 and fulfills the diversity workplan and report requirements pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 17053.98 or Section 23698.

(vii) A qualified motion picture described in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (8) of subdivision (k) of Section 17053.98 or Section 23698 that applies for an allocation of credits under this section shall be subject to the requirements of this subparagraph and not those of clause (iv) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (k) of Sections 17053.98 and 23698 and paragraph (3) of subdivision (k) of Sections 17053.98 and 23698.

(4) Obtain, when possible, the following information from applicants that
 do not receive an allocation of credit:

(A) Whether the qualified motion picture that was the subject of the application was completed.

(B) If completed, in which state or foreign jurisdiction was the primary principal photography completed.

(C) Whether the applicant received any financial incentives from the state or foreign jurisdiction to make the qualified motion picture in that location.

(5) Provide the Legislative Analyst’s Office, upon request, any or all application materials or any other materials received from, or submitted by, applicants for which a credit allocation decision has been made, including, but not limited to, applicants that did not receive a credit allocation. Materials provided to the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall be in
 electronic format when available and include, but not be limited to, information provided pursuant to subclauses (I) to (III), inclusive, of clause (ii) of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (3).

(6) The information provided to the California Film Commission pursuant to this section shall constitute confidential tax information for purposes of Article 2 (commencing with Section 19542) of Chapter 7 of Part 10.2.

(7) (A) Notwithstanding any other law, on or after July 1, 2030, the California Film Commission may allocate, pursuant to this section, any previously allocated credits not certified that have not previously been added to credit amounts available for allocation under this section or a successor section or sections.

(B) For purposes of this section, “previously allocated credits not certified”
 means either of the following:

(i) Credits allocated under paragraph (1) for which the qualified taxpayer to which the credit amounts were originally allocated has notified the California Film Commission in writing that the qualified taxpayer will not request certification for the allocated credits.

(ii) The difference between the amount of credits allocated under paragraph (1) to a qualified taxpayer and the amount of credits the California Film Commission certified, for that qualified taxpayer. For purposes of calculating the difference, the California Film Commission shall not consider any credit amounts for which the qualified taxpayer notifies the California Film Commission under clause (i).

(8) Notwithstanding any other law, on or after July 1, 2030, the California Film Commission may allocate, pursuant to this
 section, any credit amounts described in subparagraphs (B) and (E) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) that have not previously been added to credit amounts available for allocation under this section or a successor section or sections.
